dictionaries/hr/index.dic
AGIP/403
AOP/403
ASEAN/403
AVNOJ/403
CNC/403
crpsti/415
CT/403
CV/403
DDR/403
DEM/403
DNS/403
DVD/403
EU/403
FTP/403
HNL/403
HP/403
HPV/403
HSP/403
HSU/402
HTV/403
HTZ/403
HV/403
HVO/403
HŽ/403
IRC/403
ISBN/403
iscrpsti/414
Jastrebarsko/409
JAT/403
JFK/403
JMBG/403
KESS/403
Križevci/407
MORH/403
MOST/403
NATO/403
NOB/403
NSK/403
NT/403
OAPEC/403
ovan/404
pas/405
PDF/403
PMF/403
Pokupsko/409
prostrti/416
RAM/403
SAD/403
Savao/412
slati/410
slijev/408
SMS/403
SNS/403
SPD/403
SSD/403
staklo/406
TANJUG/403
Topusko/409
Trnsko/409
TV/403
UNCTAD/403
UNDP/403
UNESCO/403
UNFPA/403
UNICEF/402
USB/403
Vinkovci/407
Volosko/409
Vrbovsko/409
WC/403
ZAVNOH/403
Zvjezdana/413
